Idaho statutes. Title 63 REVENUE AND TAXATION
Chapter 29
THE IDAHO CORPORATE HEADQUARTERS INCENTIVE ACT OF 2005

Sec.

§ 63-2901. Short title. [Repealed.]

§ 63-2902. Definitions. [Repealed.]

§ 63-2903. Additional income tax credit for capital investment. [Repealed.]

§ 63-2904. Real property improvement tax credit. [Repealed.]

§ 63-2905. Additional income tax credit for new jobs. [Repealed.]

§ 63-2906. Limitations, and other provisions on credits against income taxes. [Repealed.]

§ 63-2907. Recapture. [Repealed.]

§ 63-2908. Sales and use tax incentives — Rebates

Recapture. [Repealed.]

§ 63-2909. Property tax incentives. [Repealed.]

§ 63-2910. Administration. [Repealed.]